Massachusetts, session 194th, H1456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or session law to the contrary, community
colleges as defined in Section 10 of Chapter 15A of the Massachusetts General Laws may apply
for grant funding from the Career Technical Initiative operated by the Commonwealth
Corporation for the purpose of building out industry-recognized credentialing pathways for adult
learners in technical and trade fields through courses run in the evening. Community college
based career technical institutes shall be required to meet the same standards for approval as
career technical institutes based in vocational technical schools, and shall be included in all
reports related to the Career Technical Initiative.
of 1